en: Bagnoli truffles, Tuber mesentericum
es: Trufas de pino, Tuber mesentericum
fr: Tuber mesentericum, truffe de Lorraine
hr: Bagnoli tartufi
la: Tuber mesentericum

en: Black truffles, Périgord truffles, French black truffles, Black Périgord truffles
es: Trufas negras de Perigord, Trufas Perigord, Trufas negras, Trufas de Perigord, Tuber melanosporum
fr: Truffes du Périgord, Truffes noires, Truffe noire, Tuber melanosporum, Truffes noires du Périgord, Truffes du Tricastin, truffes du Ventoux, truffes noires de Norcia, truffes noires de Spoleto
hr: Crni tartufi
ja: 黒トリュフ
la: Tuber melanosporum
nl: Zwarte truffels

en: Burgundy truffles, Tuber uncinatum
es: Trufas de Borgoña, Trufas de otoño, Trufas uncinatum, Tuber uncinatum
fr: Truffes de Bourgogne, Tuber uncinatum
hr: Bordo tartufi
la: Tuber uncinatum

en: Chinese black truffles, Tuber indicum
es: Trufas negras chinas, Trufas chinas, Tuber indicum
fr: Truffes de Chine, Tuber indicum
hr: Kineski crni tartufi
la: Tuber indicum
nl: Chinese truffels

en: Summer truffles, Tuber aestivum
es: Trufas de verano, Tuber aestivum
fr: Tuber aestivum, truffe Mayenque, truffe noire d'été
hr: Ljetni tartufi
la: Tuber aestivum
nl: Zomertruffels

en: White truffles, Trifola d'Alba, Tuber magnatum
es: Trufas blancas de Alba, Trufas del Alba, Trufas blancas italianas, Trufas blancas del Piamonte, Trufas magnatum, Tuber magnatum
fr: Truffes blanches d'Alba, Truffe blanche d'Alba, Tuber magnatum
hr: Bijeli tartuf
ja: 白トリュフ
la: Tuber magnatum
nl: Witte truffels

en: Whitish truffles, Tuber borchii, Tuber albidum pico
es: Trufas bianchetto, Bianchetto, Trufas de Borch, Trufas de marzo, Trufas borchii, Tuber borchii, Tuber albidum pico
fr: Truffes de Toscane, tuber borchii, tuber albidum pico, truffe blanche de mars
hr: Bjelkasti tartufi
la: Tuber borchii, Tuber albidum pico

en: Winter truffles, Tuber brumale
es: Trufas de invierno, Trufa brumale, Tuber brumale
fr: Tuber brumale, truffe musquée, ivernenco, pudendo, rougeotte
hr: Zimski tartufi
la: Tuber brumale
nl: Wintertruffels

en: Canned mushrooms
bg: Гъби от консерва
de: Dosenpilze, Pilze in Dosen
es: Setas en conserva, Hongos en conserva
fi: purkitetut sienet
fr: Champignons en conserve, Champignons appertisés
hr: Konzervirane gljive
hu: Növényi alapú konzerv élelmiszerek
it: Funghi in scatola
nl: Paddestoelen in blik/pot
pl: Grzyby konserwowe
pt: Cogumelos em lata
ru: Консервированные грибы

en: Canned bloody milk cap
es: Rovellones en conserva, Rovellón en conserva, Lactarius sanguifluus en conserva
fr: Lactaires sanguins en conserve, Lactarius sanguifluus en conserve
hr: Konzervirano krvavo mlijeko cap
nl: Bloedmelkzammen in blik/pot

en: Canned champignon mushrooms, Canned common mushrooms, Canned white mushrooms, Canned white button mushrooms, Canned button mushrooms, Canned Agaricus bisporus, Canned cultivated mushrooms
de: Dosenchampignons, Champignons in Dosen
es: Champiñones en conserva, Champiñones de París en conserva, Champiñones comunes en conserva, Champiñones blancos en conserva, Agaricus bisporus en conserva
fi: Säilykkeet herkkusienet
fr: Champignons de Paris en conserve, Conserves de champignons de Paris, Agaricus bisporus en conserve, Champignons de Paris appertisés, Champignons de couche appertisés
hr: Šampinjoni iz konzerve
it: Funghi champignon in scatola, Champignon in scatola
nl: Champignons in blik/pot

en: Canned quartered champignon mushrooms, Canned quartered common mushrooms, Canned quartered white mushrooms, Canned quartered white button mushrooms, Canned quartered button mushrooms
es: Champiñones en cuartos en conserva, Champiñones cuarteados en conserva, Champiñones de París en cuartos en conserva, Champiñones de París cuarteados en conserva
fr: Quartiers de champignons de Paris en conserve
hr: Šampinjoni iz konzerve narezani na četvrtine
nl: Gevierendeelde champignons in blik/pot

en: Canned sliced champignon mushrooms, Canned sliced common mushrooms, Canned sliced white mushrooms, Canned sliced white button mushrooms, Canned sliced button mushrooms
es: Champiñones laminados en conserva, Champiñones de París laminados en conserva
fr: Champignons de Paris émincés en conserve
hr: Šampinjoni narezani iz konzerve
it: Funghi champignon a fettine in scatola
nl: Champignons in plakjes in blik/pot

en: Canned whole champignon mushrooms, Canned whole common mushrooms, Canned whole white mushrooms, Canned whole white button mushrooms, Canned whole button mushrooms
es: Champiñones enteros en conserva, Champiñones de París enteros en conserva
fr: Champignons de Paris entiers en conserve
hr: Cijelih šampinjona iz konzerve
nl: Hele champignons in blik/pot

en: Canned chanterelles, Canned golden chanterelles, Canned girolles, Canned Cantharellus cibarius
es: Rebozuelos en conserva, Chantarelas en conserva, Cantharellus cibarius en conserva
fr: Girolles en conserve, Cantharellus cibarius en conserve
hr: Konzervirane lisičarke
nl: Cantharellen in blik/pot, Hanekammen in blik/pot

en: Canned Hygrophorus latitabundus
es: Setas babosa negra en conserva, Setas llanega en conserva, Setas llanega negra en conserva, Hygrophorus latitabundus en conserva
fr: Hygrophorus latitabundus en conserve
hr: Konzervirani hygrophorus latitabundus
nl: Hygrophorus latitabundus in blik/pot

en: Canned king trumpet mushrooms, Canned french horn mushrooms, Canned king oyster mushrooms, Canned king brown mushrooms, Canned boletus of the steppes, Canned trumpet royale, Canned Pleurotus eryngii
es: Setas de cardo en conserva, Pleurotus eryngii en conserva
fr: Pleurotes du panicaut en conserve, Encore argouane en conserve, Bérigoule en conserve, Girboulot en conserve, Pleurotus eryngii en conserve
hr: Konzervirane kraljevske gljive trube
nl: Kruisdisteloesterzwam in blik/pot

en: Canned nameko mushrooms, Canned nameko, Canned Pholiota nameko
es: Setas nameko en conserva, Nameko en conserva, Pholiota nameko en conserva
fr: Champignons nameko en conserve, Nameko en conserve, Pholiota nameko en conserve
hr: Nameko gljive iz konzerve

en: Canned oyster mushrooms, Canned Pleurotus ostreatus
es: Setas de ostra en conserva, Setas ostra en conserva, Champiñones ostra en conserva, Gírgolas en conserva, Pleurotus ostreatus en conserva
fr: Pleurotes en conserve, Pleurotes en huître en conserve, Pleurotus ostreatus en conserve
hr: Konzervirane bukovače
nl: Oesterzwammen in blik/pot

en: Canned paddy straw mushrooms, Canned straw mushrooms, Canned Volvariella volvacea
es: Champiñones de Straw en conserva, Setas de arroz en conserva, Paja seta en conserva, Setas volvarea en conserva, Seta volvarea en conserva, Volvariella volvacea en conserva
fr: Volvaire volvacée en conserve, Volvaire cultivée en conserve, Volvaire asiatique en conserve, Volvariella volvacea en conserve
hr: Konzervirane neoluštene gljive
nl: Tropische beurszwammen in blik/pot